Wyoming, session 2026, HB0101.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 3-1-206(a)(iii), (iv) and by creating
a new paragraph (v), 3-2-104 by creating a new subsection
(c), 3—2-109(a)(intro), 3-2-201(a)(ix) and by creating new
paragraphs (xi) and (xii) and 3-3-601 are amended to read:

HB0101

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0306
3-1-206. Rights of ward.

(a) The ward under any guardianship or
conservatorship shall have the right to:

(iii) Freedom from inappropriate physical or
chemical restraints; and

(iv) All other rights available to residents of
any private or public facility to which the ward is
admitted or program in which the ward participates subject
to any order of the court;. and

(v) Monthly in-person contact from the guardian
to monitor the well-being of the ward which the court shall
review.

3-2-104. Appointment of guardian.

(c) In any case in which a person is appointed as
guardian or limited guardian under this title, the court
shall charge the ward or the ward's estate for court costs
and reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian or limited
HB0101

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0306
guardian only to the extent the court determines there
exists financial ability to pay. In no case shall costs or
fees be allowed in an amount which would unreasonably
diminish the ward's estate so as to substantially endanger
the ward's financial independence. Any person providing
services as a guardian or limited guardian shall not
receive payment for those services in an amount greater
than the rate provided under 42 U.S.C. § 405(j)(4)(A).

3-2-109. Guardian's report.

(a) The guardian shall present to the court and file
in the guardianship proceedings a signed, written, report
on the physical condition, including level of disability or
functional incapacity, principal residence, treatment, care
and activities of the ward, as well as providing a
description of those actions the guardian has taken on
behalf of the ward, and a written account, with dates, of
each in-person contact with the ward to be verified by the
court:

3-2-201. Powers and duties of guardian.

HB0101

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0306
(a) The guardian shall:

(ix) Request the court to modify the guardian's
range of duties if the changed circumstances of the ward
require such modification; and

(xi) Make monthly in-person contact with the
ward on a regular basis and keep a written account of each
personal contact with the ward which the court shall
review; and

(xii) Notify all entities the guardian pays on
behalf of the ward that the guardian is now the guardian of
the ward.

3-3-601. General duties of conservator.

The conservator of the estate shall protect and preserve
it, invest it prudently, account for it as provided in the
Wyoming statutes, expend it for the benefit of the ward and
perform all other duties required by law. At the
termination of the conservatorship, the conservator shall
deliver the assets of the ward to the person entitled to
HB0101

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0306
receive them. The conservator shall notify all entities the
conservator pays on behalf of the ward that the conservator
is now the conservator of the ward.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0101